Illinois, session 104th, SB2261.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,600,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Public Health for the 7purpose of funding Duchenne muscular dystrophy screenings for 8newborn babies. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.